Louisiana, session 2026, SB206.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:440.4(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§440.4. Cardiac health; student athletes, parents; communication
* * *
C.(1) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, a qualified healthcare
professional who performs a physical examination of a student athlete shall
include in the examination a cardiovascular prescreening that follows nationally
recognized, evidence-based guidelines recommended by the American College
of Cardiology, American Heart Association, or other nationally recognized
organizations focused on evidence-based cardiovascular care.
(2) A student athlete with a positive finding shall be referred for further
evaluation and testing.
(3) Educational materials that provide information about causes of
sudden cardiac arrest in minor children that follow evidence-based science shall
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 206 ENROLLED
be distributed to parents or guardians of students participating in school sports
as part of a student's required physical examination and completion of athletic
permission forms.

PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.